Georgia statutes. TITLE 26 Food, Drugs, and Cosmetics
CHAPTER 2 Standards, Labeling, and Adulteration of Food

Administrative rules and regulations.

General Rules, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Agriculture, Food Division Regulations, Chapter 40-7-1.

Additional Regulations Applicable to Salvageable Foods and Single Service Items, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Agriculture, Food Service Regulations, Chapter 40-7-2.

Additional Regulations Applicable to Corn Meal, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Agriculture, Food Division Regulations, Chapter 40-7-3.